California, session 20252026, AB996.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30985 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30985. (a) A local government lying, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone or within the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission shall develop a sea level rise plan as part of either of the following, as applicable:(1) A local coastal program that is subject to approval by the California Coastal Commission consistent with the guidelines established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30985.2.(2) A subregional San Francisco Bay shoreline resiliency plan that is subject to approval by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission consistent with the guidelines established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30985.2.(b) The sea level rise plan required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) The use of the best available science.(2) A vulnerability assessment that includes efforts to ensure equity for at-risk communities.(3) Sea level rise adaptation strategies and recommended projects.(4) Identification of lead planning and implementation agencies.(5) A timeline for updates, as needed, based on conditions and projections and as determined by the local government in agreement with the California Coastal Commission or the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, as applicable.(c) A timeline for sea level rise plan updates, as required pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), shall include economic impact analyses of, at a minimum, costs to critical public infrastructure and recommended approaches for implementing the sea level rise adaptation strategies and recommended projects pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).(d) All local governments subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) shall comply with this section by January 1, 2034.(e) For purposes of this section, “critical public infrastructure” includes, but is not limited to, transit, roads, airports, ports, water storage, and conveyance, wastewater treatment facilities, landfills, powerplants, and railroads.(f) The California Coastal Commission or the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission may deem existing sea level rise information or sea level rise plans prepared by a local government to satisfy one or all of the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c).SEC. 2. Section 30985.7 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:30985.7. (a) A local government is encouraged to consult with the California Coastal Commission, on or before January 1, 2029, in preparation of a local coastal program or an amendment to a local coastal program pursuant to this division to ensure that, upon formal submission of the local coastal program or an amendment to the local coastal program to the California Coastal Commission, the materials are sufficient for a thorough and complete review. (b) A local government’s participation in an early consultation pursuant to this section is voluntary. An early consultation is intended to help a local government to timely meet the requirements of this division. Participation in an early consultation at any time shall not prevent a local government from submitting a sea level rise plan as required by this division. (c) If a local government seeks to engage in an early consultation at any time with the California Coastal Commission, the following shall occur: (1) A local government shall initiate the early consultation by notifying California Coastal Commission staff in writing that the local government seeks to engage in a consultation. After providing this notification, the local government shall provide the California Coastal Commission a summary report on the status of its efforts to develop a sea level rise plan pursuant to Section 30985, including any draft components as outlined in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 30985, and may provide a draft local coastal program or an amendment to a local coastal program that is intended to satisfy the requirement of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 30985.(2) An early consultation may include a singular meeting or regular meetings. The meeting schedule shall be mutually agreed upon by the local government and the California Coastal Commission.(3) California Coastal Commission staff shall offer written recommendations to a local government about what may preclude certification of a local coastal program or an amendment to a local coastal program, including, but not limited to, information about what satisfies the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 30985.(4) California Coastal Commission staff shall provide recommendations in a reasonable timeframe that is mutually agreed upon by both the local government and the commission.